Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 3. Regulatory Takings

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of rule requiring public use for which property is condemned to be “more necessary” or “higher use” than public use to which property is already appropriated — state takings, 49 ALR5th 769.

§ 9-5-301.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Regulatory Takings Act.”

History.

1995, ch. 113, § 1.

§ 9-5-302.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Constitutional implications” means the unconstitutional taking of private property as determined by the attorney general in light of current case law;

“Government agency” means the state of Wyoming and any officer, agency, board, commission, department or similar body of the executive branch of state government;

“Governmental action” or “action”:

Means:

Proposed rules by a state agency that if adopted and enforced may limit the use of private property;

Required dedications or exactions from owners of private property by a state agency.

Does not include:

Activity in which the power of eminent domain is exercised formally;

Repealing rules discontinuing governmental programs or amending rules in a manner that lessens interference with the use of private property;

Law enforcement activity involving seizure or forfeiture of private property for violations of law or as evidence in criminal proceedings;

Orders that are authorized by statute, that are issued by a state agency or a court of law and that were the result of a violation of state law;

Actions necessary to maintain or protect public health and safety.

“Private property” means property protected by amendments V and XIV of the constitution of the United States or article 1, section 33 of the constitution of the state of Wyoming;

“Taking” means an uncompensated taking of private property in violation of the state or federal constitution;

“This act” means W.S.

9-5-301

through

9-5-305

.

History.

1995, ch. 113, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-5-303.
Guidelines and checklist for assessment of takings.

The attorney general shall develop guidelines and a checklist by October 1, 1995, to assist government agencies in the identification and evaluation of actions that have constitutional implications that may result in a taking. The attorney general shall review and update the checklist and guidelines to maintain consistency with changes in the law.

In formulating the guidelines and checklist, the attorney general shall consider the following:

A description of how the action or regulation affects private property;

The likelihood that the action or regulation may constitute a taking;

The statutory purpose to be served by the action or regulation;

Whether the action or regulation advances that purpose;

Whether the restriction imposed is proportionate to the overall problem;

An estimate of the agency’s financial liability should the action or regulation be held to constitute a taking of private property;

Alternatives considered by the agency, or proposed by the public, which would reduce the impact of the regulation upon private property;

Any other relevant criteria as may be determined by the attorney general.

History.

1995, ch. 113, § 1.

§ 9-5-304.
Agency responsible to evaluate takings.

The agency shall use the guidelines and checklist prepared pursuant to W.S.

9-5-303

to evaluate proposed administrative actions or regulations that may have constitutional implications.

In addition to the guidelines prepared under W.S.

9-5-303

, state agencies shall consider the following criteria in their actions:

If an agency requires a person to obtain a permit for a specific use of private property, conditions imposed on issuing the permit shall directly relate to the purpose for which the permit is issued and shall substantially advance that purpose;

Any other relevant information as may be determined by the agency.

History.

1995, ch. 113, § 1.

§ 9-5-305.
Declaration of purpose.

The purpose of this act is to establish an orderly, consistent process that better enables governmental bodies to evaluate whether proposed regulatory or administrative actions may result in a taking of private property or violation of due process. It is not the purpose of this act to expand or reduce the scope of private property protections provided in the state and federal constitutions.

History.

1995, ch. 113, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-5-302(a)(vi).